Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-2,135
Relocation affidavit.

(a) If an order under section 76-2,132 requires the construction of an improvement as a condition for relocation of an easement, relocation is substantially complete, and the easement holder is able to enter, use, and enjoy the easement in the new location, the servient estate owner shall:

(1) record, in the land records of each jurisdiction where the servient estate is located, an affidavit certifying that the easement has been relocated; and

(2) send, by certified mail, a copy of the recorded affidavit to the easement holder and parties to the civil action.

(b) Until an affidavit under subsection (a) of this section is recorded and sent, the easement holder may enter, use, and enjoy the easement in the current location, subject to the court's order under section 76-2,132 approving relocation.

(c) If an order under section 76-2,132 does not require an improvement to be constructed as a condition of the relocation, recording the order under subsection (d) of section 76-2,132 constitutes relocation.

Laws 2021, LB501, § 72.